Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2038
Definition of certain solid wastes; council; adopt rules and regulations.

The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which define lead-acid batteries, discarded household appliances, waste oil, and unregulated hazardous wastes, except household hazardous wastes, which are exempt from the regulations under the Environmental Protection Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 1207, § 9.

Environmental Protection Act, see section 81-1532.